Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 3341.
Cattle, horses, sheep, goats, or swine.

A person who knowingly permits cattle, horses, sheep, goats, or swine to run at large in a public highway or yard belonging to a public building without the consent of the selectboard shall be fined not more than $10.00 nor less than $3.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

Particular cases.

Where the defendant, or his son, kept so near a horse that, owing to its training, it would not wander about the highway when thus left, and would, and did, on such occasions go directly back to the defendant’s premises, or to his son, it was not running at large within the meaning of this section. Russell v. Cone, 46 Vt. 600, 1874 Vt. LEXIS 41 (1874).

§ 3342.
Public park, common, or green.

A person who permits cattle, horses, sheep, goats, or swine to run at large in a public park, common, or green without the consent of the selectboard shall be fined not more than $25.00 nor less than $5.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3343.
Yard of townhouse, church, or schoolhouse.

A person who turns cattle, horses, sheep, goats, or swine into a yard belonging to a townhouse, church, or schoolhouse, which is properly enclosed, or knowingly permits them to run in such a yard, shall be fined not more than $10.00 nor less than $3.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2021, No. 20

, § 191.

§ 3344.
Burial ground.

A person who knowingly turns cattle, horses, sheep, goats, or swine into a properly enclosed burial ground, or who knowingly permits them to run within a properly enclosed burial ground, shall be fined $25.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2021, No. 20

, § 192.

§ 3345.
Land or premises of another.

A person who knowingly permits his or her cattle, horses, sheep, goats, swine, or domestic fowls to go upon the lands or premises of another, after the latter has given the owner notice thereof, shall be fined not more than $10.00 nor less than $2.00.
Such person shall also be liable for the damages suffered, which may be recovered in a civil action.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3346.
Bulls.

The owner or keeper of a bull may be fined not more than $100.00 if such bull is more than nine months old and found unattended outside the premises owned or occupied by the owner or keeper of such bull and shall be liable to a party damaged by such bull while outside the premises of such owner or keeper.
The damages may be recovered in a civil action.

§ 3347.
Rams.

Rams shall not be allowed to go at large between August 1 and December 1 in each year. The owner or keeper of a ram shall be liable for damages sustained by a person in consequence of such ram going at large during such time.

If during such time a ram is found with sheep other than those of its owner or keeper, and not in his or her enclosure, the owner or keeper of such sheep may recover $5.00 of the owner or keeper of such ram, in a civil action.

§ 3348.
Marking.

On or before August 1 in each year, the owner or keeper of a ram shall place on its body in durable and legible characters the initials of his or her name.

If a ram is found at large out of the enclosure and possession of its owner or keeper between August 1 and December 1, without being marked as provided in subsection (a), the person taking and securing it may recover $5.00 of the owner or keeper, to be recovered in a civil action.

If a person takes up and secures a ram thus found at large with such initials upon its body, he or she shall give notice within two days to the owner thereof, if known, and if not known, shall post in a public place near where the same was found, a written notice describing the marks upon its body and the place where secured. If the owner, within six days thereafter, tenders or pays to such person $3.00, the ram shall be restored, otherwise it shall become the property of such person.

§ 3349.
Stallions.

An owner or keeper of a stallion, more than one year old, who intentionally or negligently permits the stallion to run at large out of the enclosure of the owner or keeper, shall be fined for each instance not more than $500.00 nor less than $100.00 and shall also be liable to a party injured for the damage done by the stallion while running at large.

A person who owns or keeps a stallion over one year of age, between April 1 and December 1, in a private enclosure in a manner that disturbs and annoys the owner or occupant of adjoining premises shall be fined $5.00 for each week that the owner or keeper keeps the stallion after the owner or keeper has received three days’ notice from an adjoining owner or occupant to remove the stallion.

HISTORY:

Amended

1997, No. 16

, § 2;

2021, No. 20

, § 193.

§ 3350.
The disposition of feral swine.

The General Assembly finds that feral swine, as defined in

10 V.S.A. § 4709

, have the potential for spreading serious disease to domestic livestock, may cause devastating destruction to natural ecosystems, and pose a threat to human health and safety.

In light of the potential impacts of feral swine, and notwithstanding the provisions of law in this chapter, the Department of Fish and Wildlife may destroy or euthanize a feral swine in accordance with the requirements of

10 V.S.A. § 4709(f)

.

The exercise by the Department of Fish and Wildlife of the authority under

10 V.S.A. § 4709(f)

shall not prevent any person from pursuing or collecting the remedies set forth in this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 23.